Washington statutes.
RCW 41.06.167

Compensation surveys required for officers and officer candidates of the Washington state patrol—Limited public disclosure exemption.

The director of financial management shall undertake comprehensive compensation surveys for officers and entry-level officer candidates of the Washington state patrol, with such surveys to be conducted in the year prior to the convening of every other one hundred five day regular session of the state legislature. Salary and fringe benefit survey information collected from private employers which identifies a specific employer with the salary and fringe benefit rates which that employer pays to its employees shall not be subject to public disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW.

[ 2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 316; 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 413; 2005 c 274 s 279; 2002 c 354 s 212; 1991 c 196 s 1; 1986 c 158 s 7; 1985 c 94 s 3; 1980 c 11 s 2; 1979 c 151 s 60; 1977 ex.s. c 152 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Short title—2002 c 354: See RCW 41.80.907.

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 152: See note following RCW 41.06.150.